Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-120
Waste; damages recoverable.

When conduct claimed to constitute waste is made the basis of a claim for damages, the claimant is limited to a recovery of compensatory damages and is not entitled to multiple damages or to declare a forfeiture of the place wasted or of the interest of the defendant in the place wasted, except in accordance with covenants, agreements or conditions binding such defendants.

Laws 1941, c. 153, § 20, p. 598;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-1020;

R.S.1943, § 76-120.